Hawaii, session 2026, GM1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 489, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART UNIVERSAL CHANGING ACCOMMODATIONS
§489-A Definitions. As used in this part:
"New establishment" means a place of public accommodation
or public entity construction that is planned and designed after
July 31, 2027.
"Public entity" has the same meaning as defined in title 42
United States Code section 12131.
"Public entity construction" means any building
construction project or program initiated by a public entity or
that utilizes public entity funds.
"Restroom for public use" means a restroom for a place of
public accommodation or public entity construction that is
accessible to persons other than employees.
2026-2534 SB2268 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
iniHiiiBiiiniiiiiiiiiiNiii

Page 2 S.B. NO.
^*2
C.D. 1
"Universal changing accommodation" means a powered,
height-adjustable adult changing station that is floor- or
wall-mounted and installed within an enclosed restroom facility
in a restroom for public use.
§489-B Universal changing accommodations; required. (a)
Each new establishment shall provide, at a minimum, one
universal changing accommodation within the building in a
restroom for public use, as follows:
(1) Two universal changing accommodations for
establishments utilizing gender-designated restrooms;
provided that at least one is designated for or
accessible by women and at least one is designated for
or accessible by men; or
(2) One universal changing accommodation that is
accessible to people of any gender identity or
expression.
(b) Each new establishment shall conspicuously post
signage indicating the location of each universal changing
accommodation.
(c) A violation of this section shall constitute an
unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to this chapter.
2026-2534 SB2268 GDI SMA-l.docx
MIIIIIIIIIIMIIimilNIMIINI

Page 3 2268
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
§489-C Construction documents. Construction documents for
each new establishment shall specify whether a restroom is a
restroom for public use and the location of each universal
changing accommodation within a restroom for public use pursuant
to section 489-B.
§489-D Undue burden exemption. A new establishment shall
not be subject to the provisions of this part if compliance
would create an undue burden. Compliance shall be deemed to
create an undue burden if:
(1) The construction of a universal changing accommodation
in compliance with this part is technically infeasible
as the term is defined in the 2010 Americans with
Disabilities Act Standards for Accessible Design,
title 28 Code of Federal Regulations part 36, appendix
D, section 106.5; or
(2) The cost of providing universal changing
accommodations exceeds ten per cent of the cost of
constructing, purchasing, or substantially modifying
the new establishment.
§489-E Violations; unlawful discriminatory practice;
private cause of action. (a) Any person who is injured by an
2026-2534 SB2268 CDl SMA-l.docx

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to this part may bring
proceedings to enjoin the unlawful discriminatory practice. If
the judgment is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be
awarded:
(1) Reasonable attorneys' fees;
(2) The cost of the suit; and
(3) The sum of $100.
(b) Any action under this part shall be subject to the
jurisdiction of the district courts pursuant to chapter 604 and
may be commenced and conducted in the small claims division of
the district court.
§489-F Exclusion from civil rights commission.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this part shall
not be subject to chapter 368 and shall not be enforced by the
civil rights commission.
§489-G Exen^tion. This part shall not apply to public
school facilities.
For the purposes of this section, "public school facility"
means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is owned,
leased, or operated by the department of education for the
primary purpose of providing elementary or secondary education,
2026-2534 SB2268 GDI SMA-l.docx
illilllllMIIIIIIIIIIIIMINn

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
including classrooms, administrative offices, and restrooms that
serve students enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve."
SECTION 2. Section 489-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§489-6 Complaint against unfair discrimination; reporting
requirements. The civil rights commission shall receive
complaints of unfair discriminatory treatment in public
accommodations in accordance with the procedures established
under chapter 368; provided that this section shall not apply to
complaints under part II [of thio- cha-ptor--.-] or
SECTION 3. Section 489-7.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Any person who is injured by an unlawful
discriminatory practice, other than an unlawful discriminatory
practice under part II [of thio ohuptor, ] or may:
(1) Sue for damages sustained, and, if the judgment is for
the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be awarded a sum
not less than $1,000 or threefold damages by the
plaintiff sustained, whichever sum is the greater, and
reasonable attorneys' fees together with the costs of
suit; and
2026-2534 SB2268 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 6
S.B. NO. ““
C.D. 1
I (2) Bring proceedings to enjoin the unlawful
discriminatory practices, and if the decree is for the
plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable
attorneys' fees together with the cost of suit."
SECTION 4. Section 489-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) This section shall not apply to violations of part II
[of thio-chapter.] or"
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 7. In codifying the new sections added by
section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
2026-2534 SB2268 CDl SMA-l.docx
liMMIMIilllllHIHIIIIIIinilllll

Page 7
S.B. NO. ““
C.D. 1
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2534 SB2268 CDl SMA-l.docx 7
iniiiiiiHHiMiiiiiniiiiiiiiin

S.B. NO.
"’2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2268, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
230-26

SB No. 2268, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives